North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 7. Coastal Area Management.

Part 1. Organization and Goals.

§ 113A-100.
Short title.

This Article shall be known as the Coastal Area Management Act of 1974.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

Cross References.

For requirements necessitated by temporary implementation of federal Phase II Stormwater Management and the Stormwater Management Rule, see the notes under

G.S. 143-214.7

.

Temporary Rules Regarding Exceptions to Setback.

Session Laws 2000-142, s. 3, provides that, notwithstanding G.S. 150B-21.3(a) and 26 NCAC 2C.0102(11), the Coastal Resources Commission may adopt a temporary rule to establish criteria for exceptions to the regulatory requirement, effective August 1, 2000, of a 30-foot development setback along public trust and estuarine waters to allow construction of residences on previously platted undeveloped lots of 5,000 square feet or less that are located in intensively developed areas and that would otherwise be prohibited under rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes. The temporary rule shall become effective upon its adoption by the Commission and shall remain in effect until a permanent rule that replaces the temporary rule becomes effective.

Session Laws 2001-418, ss. 1 to 3, authorize the Coastal Resources Commission to adopt temporary rules to establish additional exceptions to the 30-foot buffer requirement along public trust and estuarine waters in certain circumstances and to allow structural modifications to piers to prevent or minimize storm damage.

Session Laws 2004-1, s. 1, expiring when a permanent rule making the designation becomes effective, provides that: “For purposes of implementing Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes and rules adopted pursuant to that Article and notwithstanding any provision of that Article or those rules to the contrary, there are hereby designated as temporary unvegetated beach areas those oceanfront areas on Hatteras Island west of the new inlet breach in Dare County in which the vegetation line as shown on Dare County orthophotographs dated 4 February 2002 through 10 February 2002, was destroyed as a result of Hurricane Isabel on 18 September 2003, and the remnants of which were subsequently buried by the construction of an emergency berm. This designation shall continue until stable, natural vegetation is reestablished or until the area is permanently designated as an unvegetated beach area pursuant to 15A NCAC 07H.0304(4)(a).”

Session Laws 2013-138, ss. 1, 2, and 3.1 through 3.8, provide: “Section 1. For purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:

“(1) ‘Department’ means the Department of Environment and Natural Resources.

“(2) ‘Corps’ means the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

“(3) ‘Shallow draft navigation channel’ means (i) a waterway connection with a maximum depth of 16 feet between the Atlantic Ocean and a bay or the Atlantic Intracoastal Waterway, (ii) a river entrance to the Atlantic Ocean through which tidal and other currents flow, or (iii) other interior coastal waterways. ‘Shallow draft navigation channel‘includes the Atlantic Intracoastal Waterway and its side channels, Beaufort Harbor, Bogue Inlet, Carolina Beach Inlet, the channel from Back Sound to Lookout Back, channels connected to federal navigation channels, Lockwoods Folly River, Manteo/Shallowbag Bay, including Oregon Inlet, Masonboro Inlet, New River, New Topsail Inlet, Rodanthe, Rollinson, Shallotte River, Silver Lake Harbor, and the waterway connecting Pamlico Sound and Beaufort Harbor.

“Section 2. The Department shall take all of the following steps in order to ensure that the State’s shallow draft navigation channels are safe and navigable:

“(1) The Department shall utilize long-term agreements with Corps to maintain the dredging of the State’s shallow draft navigation channels to depths authorized on the date this act becomes law.

“(2) The Department shall assist local governments in their pursuit of general permit authorizations from the Corps to allow the local governments to dredge shallow draft navigation channels to depths and according to project designs authorized on the date this act becomes law.

“(3) The Department shall assist local governments in their pursuit of individual permits under the State Coastal Area Management Act permits issued by the Corps to allow the dredging of shallow draft navigation channels to depths greater than authorized on the date this act becomes law and to allow the placement of dredged materials on beaches.

“Section 3.1. There is hereby created the Oregon Inlet Land Acquisition Task Force for the purpose of determining, reviewing, and considering the State’s options for acquiring the federal government’s right, title, and interest in Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto, including submerged lands. A more particular description of the property to be acquired is provided in Section 3.8 of this act. Acquiring the property described in Section 3.8 of this act will allow the State to preserve Oregon Inlet and to develop long-term management solutions for preserving and enhancing the navigability of Oregon Inlet, which is both a critical transportation corridor and a critical source of commerce for the State’s Outer Banks. The Task Force shall have duties including the following:

“(1)
Consulting with the State Property Office and agencies and departments of the federal government, including the United States Department of Fish and Wildlife, United States National Park Service, Congressional Budget Office, and members of the North Carolina congressional delegation to establish the monetary value of Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto.

“(2)
Determining whether and to what degree the federal government will sell to the State Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto or exchange the property for State-owned real property. If the federal government expresses a willingness to exchange the property for State-owned property, the Task Force shall determine the identity of the State-owned property and the monetary value of the property.

“(3)
Exploring any and all options for acquiring Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto, including condemnation of the coastal lands conveyed to the federal government in a deed dated August 7, 1958, and recorded September 3, 1958, in the Dare County Registry of Deeds.

“(4)
Considering any other issues deemed relevant by the Task Force that are related to the acquisition of Oregon Inlet and the real property adjacent thereto.

“Section 3.2.
The Task Force shall consist of the following 13 members:

“(1)
The Governor or the Governor’s designee, who shall be chair.

“(2)
The Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services or the Commissioner’s designee.

“(3)
The Secretary of the Department of Administration or the Secretary’s designee.

“(4)
The Secretary of the Department of Commerce or the Secretary’s designee.

“(5)
The Secretary of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources or the Secretary’s designee.

“(6)
The Secretary of the Department of Public Safety or the Secretary’s designee.

“(7)
The Secretary of the Department of Transportation or the Secretary’s designee.

“(8)
The Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee.

“(9)
Two members of the Senate appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

“(10) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(11) The chair of the Dare County Board of Commissioners or the chair’s designee.

“Section 3.3. The terms of the members appointed under Section 3.2 of this act shall commence on July 1, 2013. A vacancy on the Task Force shall be filled by the Governor, except that a vacancy in an appointment by the General Assembly shall be filled by the original appointing authority.

“Section 3.4. The Task Force shall meet at the call of the Governor. All members of the Task Force are voting members. A majority of the members of the Task Force constitutes a quorum.

“Section 3.5. Members of the Task Force shall receive no compensation for their service, but may receive per diem, travel, and subsistence allowances in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, and 138-6, as appropriate. No State funds shall be appropriated to the Task Force or to any State agency or department for the Task Force.

“Section 3.6.
The Department of Commerce shall provide staff to the Task Force. All State agencies and departments shall provide assistance to the Task Force upon request.

“Section 3.7.
By May 1, 2014, the Task Force shall submit a report detailing its findings and recommendations to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the General Assembly. The Task Force shall terminate upon the filing of the report required by this section.”

Session Laws 2013-138, s. 3.8, provided a list of latitude and longitude points of the federally owned property to be acquired by the State.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.7(a)-(h), authorizes the initiation of negotiations by the Department of Administration with the appropriate federal authority for the acquisition of certain federally owned property for the creation of Oregon Inlet State Park. If the subject real property is acquired by the State, then, together with any other real property owned by the State within the subject area, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources is authorized to add Oregon Inlet State Park to the State Parks System. The provisions of Session Laws 2014-100, s. 14.7(a)-(h), further provides for the condemnation authority necessary to manage existing and future transportation corridors on the Outer Banks, and for the identification of federally owned property necessary to construct or manage existing and future transportation corridors on the Outer Banks.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.22(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The Division of Coastal Management and the Department of Environmental Quality shall study and provide an executive summary of readily available data and existing studies on the physical and economic, storm mitigation, and public safety benefits of out-of-state coastal storm damage reduction and beach nourishment projects. Specific items benefitted by coastal storm damage reduction shall include, at a minimum, public infrastructure, public property, private property, small businesses, and tourism. The results of the study shall be reported no later than November 1, 2016, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.

“(b) The County Tax Office of each covered county shall work together to identify all privately and publicly owned property island-wide in the county. A covered county includes the Counties of Brunswick, New Hanover, Pender, Onslow, Carteret, Hyde, Dare, and Currituck. Each County Tax Office shall determine whether the mailing/ownership address on the tax record of such property is (i) in the county where such property is located, (ii) in a noncovered county in North Carolina, or (iii) outside the State of North Carolina. Each County Tax Office shall send an electronic list of the property addresses and matched mailing/ownership addresses suitable for electronic sorting no later than November 1, 2016, to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.

“(c) The Department of Commerce shall study and provide an executive summary of readily available economic data related to the 20 coastal counties of the State for the purpose of quantifying the contribution of the coastal economy to the economy of the State as a whole, considering, at a minimum, the benefits of travel and tourism, small businesses, job creation and opportunity, and tax revenues, including property, sales, and income taxes. The Department shall report the results of the study no later than November 1, 2016, to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.

“(d) The Department of Environmental Quality shall include the studies required by each subsection of this section as appendices to the Beach and Inlet Management Plan required by Section 14.6(b)(4) of S.L. 2015-241.”

§ 113A-101.
Cooperative State-local program.

This Article establishes a cooperative program of coastal area management between local and State governments. Local government shall have the initiative for planning. State government shall establish areas of environmental concern. With regard to planning, State government shall act primarily in a supportive standard-setting and review capacity, except where local governments do not elect to exercise their initiative. Enforcement shall be a concurrent State-local responsibility.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

§ 113A-102.
Legislative findings and goals.

Findings. — It is hereby determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding that among North Carolina’s most valuable resources are its coastal lands and waters. The coastal area, and in particular the estuaries, are among the most biologically productive regions of this State and of the nation. Coastal and estuarine waters and marshlands provide almost ninety percent (90%) of the most productive sport fisheries on the east coast of the United States. North Carolina’s coastal area has an extremely high recreational and esthetic value which should be preserved and enhanced.In recent years the coastal area has been subjected to increasing pressures which are the result of the often-conflicting needs of a society expanding in industrial development, in population, and in the recreational aspirations of its citizens. Unless these pressures are controlled by coordinated management, the very features of the coast which make it economically, esthetically, and ecologically rich will be destroyed. The General Assembly therefore finds that an immediate and pressing need exists to establish a comprehensive plan for the protection, preservation, orderly development, and management of the coastal area of North Carolina.In the implementation of the coastal area management plan, the public’s opportunity to enjoy the physical, esthetic, cultural, and recreational qualities of the natural shorelines of the State shall be preserved to the greatest extent feasible; water resources shall be managed in order to preserve and enhance water quality and to provide optimum utilization of water resources; land resources shall be managed in order to guide growth and development and to minimize damage to the natural environment; and private property rights shall be preserved in accord with the Constitution of this State and of the United States.

Goals. — The goals of the coastal area management system to be created pursuant to this Article are as follows:

To provide a management system capable of preserving and managing the natural ecological conditions of the estuarine system, the barrier dune system, and the beaches, so as to safeguard and perpetuate their natural productivity and their biological, economic and esthetic values;

To insure that the development or preservation of the land and water resources of the coastal area proceeds in a manner consistent with the capability of the land and water for development, use, or preservation based on ecological considerations;

To insure the orderly and balanced use and preservation of our coastal resources on behalf of the people of North Carolina and the nation;

To establish policies, guidelines and standards for:

Protection, preservation, and conservation of natural resources including but not limited to water use, scenic vistas, and fish and wildlife; and management of transitional or intensely developed areas and areas especially suited to intensive use or development, as well as areas of significant natural value;

The economic development of the coastal area, including but not limited to construction, location and design of industries, port facilities, commercial establishments and other developments;

Recreation and tourist facilities and parklands;

Transportation and circulation patterns for the coastal area including major thoroughfares, transportation routes, navigation channels and harbors, and other public utilities and facilities;

Preservation and enhancement of the historic, cultural, and scientific aspects of the coastal area;

Protection of present common-law and statutory public rights in the lands and waters of the coastal area;

Any other purposes deemed necessary or appropriate to effectuate the policy of this Article.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

§ 113A-103.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Advisory Council” means the Coastal Resources Advisory Council created by

G.S. 113A-105

.

(1a)

“Boat” means a vessel or watercraft of any type or size specifically designed to be self-propelled, whether by engine, sail, oar, or paddle or other means, which is used to travel from place to place by water.

“Coastal area” means the counties that (in whole or in part) are adjacent to, adjoining, intersected by or bounded by the Atlantic Ocean (extending offshore to the limits of State jurisdiction, as may be identified by rule of the Commission for purposes of this Article, but in no event less than three geographical miles offshore) or any coastal sound. The Governor, in accordance with the standards set forth in this subdivision and in subdivision (3) of this section, shall designate the counties that constitute the “coastal area,” as defined by this section, and his designation shall be final and conclusive. On or before May 1, 1974, the Governor shall file copies of a list of said coastal-area counties with the chairmen of the boards of commissioners of each county in the coastal area, with the mayors of each incorporated city within the coastal area (as so defined) having a population of 2,000 or more and of each incorporated city having a population of less than 2,000 whose corporate boundaries are contiguous with the Atlantic Ocean, and with the Secretary of State. By way of illustration, the counties designated as coastal-area counties under this subdivision as of July 1, 2012, are Beaufort, Bertie, Brunswick, Camden, Carteret, Chowan, Craven, Currituck, Dare, Gates, Hertford, Hyde, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pasquotank, Pender, Perquimans, Tyrrell, and Washington. The coastal-area counties and cities shall transmit nominations to the Governor of members of the Coastal Resources Commission as provided in

G.S. 113A-104(d)

.

“Coastal sound” means Albemarle, Bogue, Core, Croatan, Currituck, Pamlico and Roanoke Sounds. For purposes of this Article, the inland limits of a sound on a tributary river shall be defined as the limits of seawater encroachment on said tributary river under normal conditions. “Normal conditions” shall be understood to include regularly occurring conditions of low stream flow and high tide, but shall not include unusual conditions such as those associated with hurricane and other storm tides. Unless otherwise determined by the Commission, the limits of seawater encroachment shall be considered to be the confluence of a sound’s tributary river with the river or creek entering it nearest to the farthest inland movement of oceanic salt water under normal conditions. For purposes of this Article, the aforementioned points of confluence with tributary rivers shall include the following:

On the Chowan River, its confluence with the Meherrin River;

On the Roanoke River, its confluence with the northeast branch of the Cashie River;

On the Tar River, its confluence with Tranters Creek;

On the Neuse River, its confluence with Swift Creek;

On the Trent River, its confluence with Ready Branch.Provided, however, that no county shall be considered to be within the coastal area which: (i) is adjacent to, adjoining or bounded by any of the above points of confluence and lies entirely west of said point of confluence; or (ii) is not bounded by the Atlantic Ocean and lies entirely west of the westernmost of the above points of confluence.

“Commission” means the Coastal Resources Commission created by

G.S. 113A-104

.

(4a)

“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Development” means any activity in a duly designated area of environmental concern (except as provided in paragraph b of this subdivision) involving, requiring, or consisting of the construction or enlargement of a structure; excavation; dredging; filling; dumping; removal of clay, silt, sand, gravel or minerals; bulkheading, driving of pilings; clearing or alteration of land as an adjunct of construction; alteration or removal of sand dunes; alteration of the shore, bank, or bottom of the Atlantic Ocean or any sound, bay, river, creek, stream, lake, or canal; or placement of a floating structure in an area of environmental concern identified in G.S. 113A-113(b)(2) or (b)(5).

The following activities including the normal and incidental operations associated therewith shall not be deemed to be development under this section:

Work by a highway or road agency for the maintenance of an existing road, if the work is carried out on land within the boundaries of the existing right-of-way, or for emergency repairs and safety enhancements of an existing road as described in an executive order issued under G.S. 166A-19.30(a)(5).

Work by any railroad company or by any utility and other persons engaged in the distribution and transmission of petroleum products, water, telephone or telegraph messages, or electricity for the purpose of inspecting, repairing, maintaining, or upgrading any existing substations, sewers, mains, pipes, cables, utility tunnels, lines, towers, poles, tracks, and the like on any of its existing railroad or utility property or rights-of-way, or the extension of any of the above distribution-related facilities to serve development approved pursuant to

G.S. 113A-121

or 113A-122;

Work by any utility and other persons for the purpose of construction of facilities for the development, generation, and transmission of energy to the extent that such activities are regulated by other law or by present or future rules of the State Utilities Commission regulating the siting of such facilities (including environmental aspects of such siting), and work on facilities used directly in connection with the above facilities;

The use of any land for the purposes of planting, growing, or harvesting plants, crops, trees, or other agricultural or forestry products, including normal private road construction, raising livestock or poultry, or for other agricultural purposes except where excavation or filling affecting estuarine waters (as defined in

G.S. 113-229

) or navigable waters is involved;

Maintenance or repairs (excluding replacement) necessary to repair damage to structures caused by the elements or to prevent damage to imminently threatened structures by the creation of protective sand dunes.

The construction of any accessory building customarily incident to an existing structure if the work does not involve filling, excavation, or the alteration of any sand dune or beach;

Completion of any development, not otherwise in violation of law, for which a valid building or zoning permit was issued prior to ratification of this Article and which development was initiated prior to the ratification of this Article;

Completion of installation of any utilities or roads or related facilities not otherwise in violation of law, within a subdivision that was duly approved and recorded prior to the ratification of this Article and which installation was initiated prior to the ratification of this Article;

Construction or installation of any development, not otherwise in violation of law, for which an application for a building or zoning permit was pending prior to the ratification of this Article and for which a loan commitment (evidenced by a notarized document signed by both parties) had been made prior to the ratification of this Article; provided, said building or zoning application is granted by July 1, 1974;

It is the intention of the General Assembly that if the provisions of any of the foregoing subparagraphs 1 to 10 of this paragraph are held invalid as a grant of an exclusive or separate emolument or privilege or as a denial of the equal protection of the laws, within the meaning of Article I, Secs. 19 and 32 of the North Carolina Constitution, the remainder of this Article shall be given effect without the invalid provision or provisions.

The Commission shall define by rule (and may revise from time to time) certain classes of minor maintenance and improvements which shall be exempted from the permit requirements of this Article, in addition to the exclusions set forth in paragraph b of this subdivision. In developing such rules the Commission shall consider, with regard to the class or classes of units to be exempted:

The size of the improved or scope of the maintenance work;

The location of the improvement or work in proximity to dunes, waters, marshlands, areas of high seismic activity, areas of unstable soils or geologic formations, and areas enumerated in G.S. 113A-113(b)(3); and

Whether or not dredging or filling is involved in the maintenance or improvement.

(5a)

“Floating structure” means any structure, not a boat, supported by a means of floatation, designed to be used without a permanent foundation, which is used or intended for human habitation or commerce. A structure shall be considered a floating structure when it is inhabited or used for commercial purposes for more than thirty days in any one location. A boat may be considered a floating structure when its means of propulsion has been removed or rendered inoperative.

“Key facilities” include the site location and the location of major improvement and major access features of key facilities, and mean:

Public facilities, as determined by the Commission, on nonfederal lands which tend to induce development and urbanization of more than local impact, including but not limited to:

Any major airport designed to serve as a terminal for regularly scheduled air passenger service or one of State concern;

Major interchanges between the interstate highway system and frontage-access streets or highways; major interchanges between other limited-access highways and frontage-access streets or highways;

Major frontage-access streets and highways, both of State concern; and

Major recreational lands and facilities;

Major facilities on nonfederal lands for the development, generation, and transmission of energy.

“Lead regional organizations” means the regional planning agencies created by and representative of the local governments of a multi-county region, and designated as lead regional organizations by the Governor.

“Local government” means the governing body of any county or city which contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to this Article.

“Person” means any individual, citizen, partnership, corporation, association, organization, business trust, estate, trust, public or municipal corporation, or agency of the State or local government unit, or any other legal entity however designated.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 133.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Environmental Quality, except where otherwise specified in this Article.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 913, s. 1; c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, s. 133; 1989, c. 727, s. 126; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 839, ss. 1, 4; 1995, c. 509, s. 58; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2012-202, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 14.7(l); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v).

Cross References.

As to the Coastal Reserve Program, see

G.S. 113A-129.2

.

§ 113A-104.
Coastal Resources Commission.

Established. — The General Assembly hereby establishes within the Department of Environmental Quality a commission to be designated the Coastal Resources Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.24(a), effective July 1, 2013.

(b1)

Composition. —

The Coastal Resources Commission shall consist of 13 members as follows:

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be a coastal property owner or experienced in land development.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be a coastal property owner or experienced in land development.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in engineering in the coastal area or a marine-related science.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in engineering in the coastal area or a marine-related science.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in coastal-related business.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in local government within the coastal area.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in coastal agriculture.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in commercial fishing.

One appointed by the Governor who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in coastal forestry.

One appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in sports fishing.

One appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

who shall serve at large.

One appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance with G.S. 120-121 who shall at the time of appointment be actively connected with or have experience in wildlife.

One appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance with G.S. 120-121 who shall serve at large.

Appointment of Members. — As used in this section, the term “appointing authority” means the Governor in the case of members appointed by the Governor and means the General Assembly in the case of members appointed by the General Assembly. Appointments to the Commission shall be made to provide knowledge and experience in a diverse range of coastal interests. The members of the Commission shall serve and act on the Commission solely for the best interests of the public and public trust, and shall bring their particular knowledge and experience to the Commission for that end alone. Counties and cities in the coastal area may designate and transmit to the appointing authorities no later than May 1 of each even-numbered year qualified persons in the categories set out in subsection (b1) of this section corresponding to the Commission positions to be filled that year.

(c1)

The members of the Commission whose qualifications are described in subdivisions (3), (6), (7), (8), (9), (11), and (12) of subsection (b1) of this section shall be persons who do not derive any significant portion of their income from land development, construction, real estate sales, or lobbying and do not otherwise serve as agents for development-related business activities.

(c2)

All members of the Commission are covered persons for the purposes of Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, the State Government Ethics Act. As covered persons, members of the Commission shall comply with the applicable requirements of the State Government Ethics Act, including mandatory training, the public disclosure of economic interests, and ethical standards for covered persons. Members of the Commission shall comply with the provisions of the State Government Ethics Act to avoid conflicts of interest. The Governor may require additional disclosure of potential conflicts of interest by the members described in subsection (c1) of this section. The Governor may promulgate criteria regarding conflicts of interest and disclosure thereof for determining the eligibility of persons described in subsection (c1) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.24(a), effective July 1, 2013.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.24(a), effective July 1, 2013.

Office May Be Held Concurrently with Others. — Membership on the Coastal Resources Commission is hereby declared to be an office that may be held concurrently with other elective or appointive offices in addition to the maximum number of offices permitted to be held by one person under

G.S. 128-1.1

.

Terms. — The members shall serve staggered terms of office of four years. At the expiration of each member’s term, the appointing authority shall reappoint or replace the member with a new member of like qualification as specified in subsection (b1) of this section.

Vacancies. — In the event of a vacancy arising otherwise than by expiration of term, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor of like qualification as specified in subsection (b1) of this section who shall then serve the remainder of his predecessor’s term.

Officers. — The chairman shall be designated by the Governor from among the members of the Commission to serve as chairman at the pleasure of the Governor. The vice-chairman shall be elected by and from the members of the Commission and shall serve for a term of two years or until the expiration of the vice-chairman’s regularly appointed term.

Compensation. — The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.24(a), effective July 1, 2013.

Attendance. — Regular attendance at Commission meetings is a duty of each member. The Commission shall develop procedures for declaring any seat on the Commission to be vacant upon failure by a member to perform this duty.

Quorum. — A majority of the Commission shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; c. 486, ss. 1-6; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1989, c. 505; c. 727, s. 218(64); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2013-360, s. 14.24(a); 2015-9, s. 1.3; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Cross References.

See editor’s notes at

G.S. 113A-100

.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Subchapter II of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 138A” in subsection (c2).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subsection (c2).

Session Laws 2001-418, ss. 1 to 3, authorize the Coastal Resources Commission to adopt temporary rules to establish additional exceptions to the 30-foot buffer requirement along public trust and estuarine waters in certain circumstances and to allow structural modifications to piers to prevent or minimize storm damage.

§ 113A-105.
Coastal Resources Advisory Council.

Creation. — There is hereby created and established a council to be known as the Coastal Resources Advisory Council.

Membership and Terms. — The Coastal Resources Advisory Council shall consist of not more than 20 members appointed or designated by the Coastal Resources Commission. Counties and cities in the coastal area may nominate candidates for consideration by the Commission. The terms of all Council members serving on the Council on January 1, 2013, shall expire on July 31, 2013. A new Council shall be appointed in the manner provided by this subsection with terms beginning on August 1, 2013, and expiring on June 30, 2015. Members may be reappointed at the discretion of the Commission, provided that one-half of the membership at the beginning of any two-year term are residents of counties in the coastal area.

Functions and Duties. — The Advisory Council shall assist the Secretary and the Secretary of Administration in an advisory capacity:

On matters which may be submitted to it by either of them or by the Commission, including technical questions relating to the development of rules, and

On such other matters arising under this Article as the Council considers appropriate.

Multiple Offices. — Membership on the Coastal Resources Advisory Council is hereby declared to be an office that may be held concurrently with other elective or appointive offices (except the office of Commission member) in addition to the maximum number of offices permitted to be held by one person under

G.S. 128-1.1

.

Chairman and Vice-Chairman. — A chairman and vice-chairman shall be elected annually by the Council.

Compensation. — The members of the Advisory Council who are not State employees shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 249, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 727, s. 127; c. 751, s. 8(14a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 26; 1995, c. 123, s. 4; c. 504, s. 7; 2013-360, s. 14.25.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.25, effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (b), added “Membership and Terms” and the language following “appointed or designated,” substituted “20” for “45,” deleted “as follows” following “appointed or designated” and deleted subdivisions (b)(1) through (b)(11).

Part 2. Planning Processes.

§ 113A-106.
Scope of planning processes.

Planning processes covered by this Article include the development and adoption of State guidelines for the coastal area and the development and adoption of a land-use plan for each county within the coastal area, which plans shall serve as criteria for the issuance or denial of development permits under Part 4.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Coastal Management Law in North Carolina: 1974-1994,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1413 (1994).

§ 113A-106.1.
Adoption of Coastal Habitat Protection Plans.

The Commission shall approve Coastal Habitat Protection Plans as provided in G.S. 143B-279.8.

History.

1997-400, s. 3.3.